Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1218
Board; meetings; organization; duties.

The board of each educational service unit shall meet and organize by naming one of its members as president, one as vice president, and one as secretary. The board shall employ a treasurer who shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the board.

The board of the educational service unit shall determine the participation of the educational service unit in providing supplementary educational services. If the board of the educational service unit does not provide supplementary educational services, it shall meet during each succeeding January to determine the participation in providing supplementary educational services for that calendar year. Meetings may be held by means of virtual conferencing in accordance with subsection (2) of section 84-1411.

Laws 1965, c. 504, § 4, p. 1610;

Laws 1969, c. 748, § 1, p. 2822;

Laws 1969, c. 746, § 5, p. 2811;

Laws 1987, LB 688, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2204;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 935;

Laws 2009, LB361, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB83, § 8.